Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-452
Hunting of antelope,
elk, mountain sheep, mountain
lion, or deer; age requirements.

(1)
No person shall hunt antelope, elk, mountain
sheep, or mountain lions unless
such person is at least twelve years of age, and any person who is twelve
through fifteen years of age shall only hunt antelope, elk, mountain sheep, or mountain lions when supervised by a person
nineteen years of age or older having a valid hunting permit.

(2) No person shall hunt deer unless such person is at least
ten years of age, and any person who is ten through fifteen years of age shall
only hunt deer when supervised by a person nineteen years of age or older
having a valid hunting permit.

(3) A person nineteen years of age or older having a valid
hunting permit shall not supervise more than two persons while hunting deer,
antelope, elk, mountain
sheep, or mountain lions at
the same time.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 162;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 43;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB690, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB928, § 4.